Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3934.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EAST METRO PFAS BIOMONITORING.new text end new text begin $365,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $710,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the environmental fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for transfer to the commissioner of health to continue per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) biomonitoring in eastern metropolitan communities. This appropriation is available until expended. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end